Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,144.04
CLP-commercial learner's permit;
precondition to issuance of commercial driver's license.

(1) The issuance of a CLP-commercial learner's
permit is a precondition to the initial issuance of a commercial driver's
license. The issuance of a CLP-commercial learner's permit is also a precondition
to the upgrade of a commercial driver's license if the upgrade requires a
skills test, however, the CLP-commercial learner's permit holder is not eligible
to take the skills test in the first fourteen days after initial issuance
of the CLP-commercial learner's permit.

(2) The CLP-commercial
learner's permit holder is not eligible to take the commercial driver's license
skills test in the first fourteen days after initial issuance of the CLP-commercial
learner's permit.

Laws 2014, LB983, § 33.